Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 427.13, as
last amended by Section 25, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 427.13), is amended to read as follows:
Section 427.13. A. All medical marijuana and medical marijuana
products shall be purchased solely from a state-licensed medical
marijuana business, and shall not be purchased from any out-of-state
providers.
B. 1. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall have
oversight and auditing responsibilities to ensure that all marijuana
being grown in this state is accounted for and shall implement an
inventory tracking system. Pursuant to these duties, the Authority
shall require that each medical marijuana business, medical
marijuana research facility, medical marijuana education facility
and medical marijuana waste disposal facility keep records for every
transaction with another medical marijuana business, patient or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1104 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

care giver. Inventory shall be tracked and updated after each
individual sale and reported to the Authority.
2. The inventory tracking system licensees use shall allow for
integration of other seed-to-sale systems and, at a minimum, shall
include the following:
a. notification of when marijuana seeds and clones are
planted,
b. notification of when marijuana plants are harvested
and destroyed,
c. notification of when marijuana is transported, sold,
stolen, diverted or lost,
d. a complete inventory of all marijuana, seeds, plant
tissue, clones, plants, usable marijuana or trim,
leaves and other plant matter, batches of extract, and
marijuana concentrates,
e. all samples sent to a testing laboratory, an unused
portion of a sample returned to a licensee, all
samples utilized by licensee for purposes of
negotiating a sale, and
f. all samples used for quality testing by a licensee.
3. Each medical marijuana business, medical marijuana research
facility, medical marijuana education facility and medical marijuana
waste disposal facility shall develop written standard operating
procedures outlining the manner in which it operates as prescribed
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1104 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

by t he Authority and shall use a seed-to-sale tracking system or
integrate its own seed-to-sale tracking system with the seed-to-sale
tracking system established by the Authority in accordance with the
limitations set forth herein.
4. These records shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
a. the name and license number of the medical marijuana
business that cultivated, manufactured or sold the
medical marijuana or medical marijuana product,
b. the address and phone number of the medical marijuana
business that cultivated, manufactured or sold the
medical marijuana or medical marijuana product,
c. the type of product received during the transaction,
d. the batch number of the marijuana plant used,
e. the date of the transaction,
f. the total spent in dollars,
g. all point-of-sale records,
h. marijuana excise tax records, and
i. any additional information as may be reasonably
required by the Executive Director of the Oklahoma
Medical Marijuana Authority.
5. All inventory tracking records retained by a medical
marijuana business, medical marijuana research facility, medical
marijuana education facility or medical marijuana waste disposal
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1104 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

faci lity containing medical marijuana patient or caregiver
information shall comply with all relevant state and federal laws
including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA).
C. The seed-to-sale inventory tracking system shall include:
1. A software infrastructure that provides maximum flexibility
for the exchange of data between the Authority and medical marijuana
business licensees;
2. Capabilities that allow the medical marijuana business
licensees to submit data to the Authority directly through an
application program interface (API), data interchange service tool,
or by other means or technology acceptable to the Authority;
3. Automated reporting for inventory and point of sale
discrepancies; and
4. Technology for payments, sales, and tax collection.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 27, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1104 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)